California statutes. Civil Code
(5) Law enforcement personnel who need to read a person’s identification document after an accident in which the person is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent.

(6) Law enforcement personnel who need to read a person’s identification document pursuant to a search warrant.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a person or entity that unintentionally remotely reads a person’s identification document using RFID in the course of operating a contactless identification document system unless it knows it unintentionally read the document and thereafter intentionally does any of the following acts:

(1) Discloses what it
 read to a third party whose purpose is to read a person’s identification document, or any information derived therefrom, without that person’s knowledge and consent.

(2) Stores what it read for the purpose of reading a person’s identification document, or any information derived therefrom, without that person’s knowledge and prior consent.

(3) Uses what it read for the purpose of reading a person’s identification document, or any information derived therefrom, without that person’s knowledge and prior consent.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to the reading, storage, use, or disclosure to a third party of a person’s identification document, or information derived therefrom, in the course of an act of good faith security research, experimentation, or scientific inquiry, including, but not limited to,
 activities useful in identifying and analyzing security flaws and vulnerabilities.

(f) Nothing in this section shall affect the existing rights of law enforcement to access data stored electronically on driver’s licenses.

(g) The penalties set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) are independent of, and do not supersede, any other penalties provided by state law, and in the case of any conflict, the greater penalties shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 54, Sec. 5.   (SB 544)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.795.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Contactless identification document system” means a group of identification documents issued and operated under a single authority that use RFID to transmit data remotely to readers intended to read that data. In a contactless identification document system, every reader must be able to read every identification document in the system.

(b) “Data” means any
 information stored or transmitted on an identification document in machine-readable form.

(c) “Identification document” means any document containing data that is issued to an individual and which that individual, and only that individual, uses alone or in conjunction with any other information for the primary purpose of establishing his or her identity. Identification documents specifically include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Driver’s licenses or identification cards issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) Identification cards for employees or contractors.

(3) Identification cards issued by educational institutions.

(4) Health insurance or benefit
 cards.

(5) Benefit cards issued in conjunction with any government-supported aid program.

(6) Licenses, certificates, registration, or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by the Business and Professions Code.

(7) Library cards issued by any public library.

(d) “Key” means a string of bits of information used as part of a cryptographic algorithm used in encryption.

(e) “Radio frequency identification” or “RFID” means the use of electromagnetic radiating waves or reactive field coupling in the radio frequency portion of the spectrum to communicate to or from an identification document through a variety of modulation and encoding schemes.

(f) “Reader” means a scanning device that is capable of using RFID to communicate with an identification document and read the data transmitted by that identification document.

(g) “Remotely” means that no physical contact between the identification document and a reader is necessary in order to transmit data using RFID.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 746, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.807. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, SEXUAL ASSAULT, AND STALKING: PERSONAL INFORMATION [1798.79.8. - 1798.79.95.]

1798.79.8.

For purposes of this title:

(a) “Person or entity” means any individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, or any business entity, or any state or local agency.

(b) “Personally identifying information” means:

(1) First and last name or last name only.

(2) Home or other physical address, including,
 but not limited to, a street name or ZIP Code, other than an address obtained pursuant to the California Safe At Home program or a business mailing address for the victim service provider.

(3) Electronic mail address or other online contact information, such as an instant messaging user identifier or a screen name that reveals an individual’s electronic mail address.

(4) Telephone number, other than a business telephone number for the victim service provider.

(5) Social security number.

(6) Date of birth, with the exception of the year of birth.

(7) Internet protocol address or host name that identifies an individual.

(8) Any
 other information, including, but not limited to, the first and last names of children and relatives, racial or ethnic background, or religious affiliation, that, in combination with any other nonpersonally identifying information, would serve to identify any individual.

(c) “Victim service provider” means a nongovernmental organization or entity that provides shelter, programs, or services at low cost, no cost, or on a sliding scale to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or their children, either directly or through other contractual arrangements, including rape crisis centers, domestic violence shelters, domestic violence transitional housing programs, and other programs with the primary mission to provide services to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or their children, whether or not that program exists in an agency that provides additional
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.79.9.

(a) In the course of awarding grants, including, but not limited to, requests for proposals, contracts, or billing procedures, implementing programs, or providing financial support or assistance for the purpose of providing shelter, programs, or services at low cost, no cost, or on a sliding scale to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or their children, to any victim service provider, it is unlawful for any person or entity to request or require that victim service provider to provide personally
 identifying information regarding any of the persons to whom it is providing services, it has provided services, or it has considered or is considering providing services.

(b) In the course of awarding grants, including, but not limited to, requests for proposals, contracts, or billing procedures, implementing programs, or providing financial support or assistance for the purpose of providing shelter, programs, or services at low cost, no cost, or on a sliding scale to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or their children, to any victim service provider, it is unlawful for any person or entity to request or require that victim service provider to use any computer software, computer program, computer protocol, or other computer system that requires the disclosure of personally identifying information regarding any of the persons to whom it is providing services, it has provided services, or it has
 considered or is considering providing services.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent the collection of information for statistical purposes that are necessary for the proper administration of the grant, program, or financial assistance, provided that collection does not require the disclosure of information that would serve to identify any specific individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.79.95.

Injunctive relief shall be available to any victim service provider aggrieved by a violation of this title. The prevailing plaintiff in any action commenced under this section shall be entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if the victim service provider has provided notice of this section and the asserted violation of this section to the defendant and the defendant has failed to cease the violation within five business days of receiving that notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81. CUSTOMER RECORDS [1798.80. - 1798.84.1.]

1798.80.

The following definitions apply to this title:

(a) “Business” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or other group, however organized and whether or not organized to operate at a profit, including a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under the law of this state, any other
 state, the United States, or of any other country, or the parent or the subsidiary of a financial institution. The term includes an entity that disposes of records.

(b) “Records” means any material, regardless of the physical form, on which information is recorded or preserved by any means, including in written or spoken words, graphically depicted, printed, or electromagnetically transmitted. “Records” does not include publicly available directories containing information an individual has voluntarily consented to have publicly disseminated or listed, such as name, address, or telephone number.

(c) “Customer” means an individual who provides personal information to a business for the purpose of purchasing or leasing a product or obtaining a service from the business.

(d) “Individual” means a natural person.

(e) “Personal information” means any information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, a particular individual, including, but not limited to, his or her name, signature, social security number, physical characteristics or description, address, telephone number, passport number, driver’s license or state identification card number, insurance policy number, education, employment, employment history, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, or any other financial information, medical information, or health insurance information. “Personal information” does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (AB 1094)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.81.

A business shall take all reasonable steps to dispose, or arrange for the disposal, of customer records within its custody or control containing personal information when the records are no longer to be retained by the business by (a) shredding, (b) erasing, or (c) otherwise modifying the personal information in those records to make it unreadable or undecipherable through any means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 134, Sec. 2.   (AB 1094)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.81.5.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that personal information about California residents is protected. To that end, the purpose of this section is to encourage businesses that own, license, or maintain personal information about Californians to provide reasonable security for that information.

(2) For the purpose of this section, the terms “own” and “license” include personal information that a business retains as part of the business’ internal customer account or for the purpose of using that information in transactions with the person to whom the information relates. The term “maintain” includes personal information that a business maintains but
 does not own or license.

(b) A business that owns, licenses, or maintains personal information about a California resident shall implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information, to protect the personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(c) A business that discloses personal information about a California resident pursuant to a contract with a nonaffiliated third party that is not subject to subdivision (b) shall require by contract that the third party implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information, to protect the personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or
 disclosure.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Personal information” means either of the following:

(A) An individual’s first name or first initial and the individual’s last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the name or the data elements are not encrypted or redacted:

(i) Social security number.

(ii) Driver’s license number, California identification card number, tax identification number, passport number, military identification number, or other unique identification number issued on a
 government document commonly used to verify the identity of a specific individual.

(iii) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination with any required security code, access code, or
 password that would permit access to an individual’s financial account.

(iv) Medical information.

(v) Health insurance information.

(vi) Unique biometric data generated from measurements or technical analysis of human body characteristics, such as a fingerprint, retina, or iris image, used to authenticate a specific individual. Unique biometric data does not include a physical or digital photograph, unless used or stored for facial recognition purposes.

(vii) Genetic data.

(B) A username or email address in combination with a password or security question and answer that would permit access to an online account.

(2) “Medical information” means any individually identifiable information, in electronic or physical form, regarding the individual’s medical history or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional.

(3) “Health insurance information” means an individual’s insurance policy number or subscriber identification number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to identify the individual, or any information in an individual’s application and claims history, including any appeals records.

(4) “Personal information” does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.

(5) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis of a biological sample of an individual, or from another source enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns genetic material. Genetic material includes, but is not limited to, deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, alterations
 or modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), uninterpreted data that results from analysis of the biological sample or other source, and any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom. 

(e) The provisions of this section do not apply to any of the following:

(1) A provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor regulated by the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1).

(2) A financial institution as defined in Section 4052 of the Financial Code and subject to the California Financial Information Privacy Act (Division 1.4 (commencing with Section 4050) of the Financial Code).

(3) A covered entity governed by the medical privacy and security rules issued by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations, established pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Availability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).

(4) An entity that obtains information under an agreement pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code and is subject to the confidentiality requirements of the Vehicle Code.

(5) A business that is regulated by state or federal law providing greater protection to personal information than that provided by this section in regard to the subjects addressed by this section. Compliance with that state or federal law shall be deemed compliance with this section with regard to those subjects. This paragraph does not relieve a business from a duty to comply with any other requirements of other state and federal law regarding the
 protection and privacy of personal information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.81.6.

(a) A consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p), that owns, licenses, or maintains personal information about a California resident, or a third party that maintains personal information about a California resident on behalf of a consumer credit reporting agency, that knows, or reasonably should know, that a computer system it owns, operates, or maintains, and for which it controls the security protocols, is subject to a security vulnerability
 that poses a significant risk, as defined in subdivision (c), to the security of computerized data that contains personal information, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1798.82, shall do all of the following:

(1) If a consumer credit reporting agency knows or reasonably should know that a software update is available to address the vulnerability as described in subdivision (a), the agency shall begin the necessary testing, planning, and assessment of its systems for implementation of that software update in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, in keeping with industry best practices, but in any case no later than three business days after becoming aware, or after the point at which it reasonably should have become aware, of the vulnerability and the available software update. The software update shall be completed in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, in keeping with industry best
 practices, but in any case no later than 90 days after becoming aware, or after the point at which it reasonably should have become aware, of the vulnerability and the available software update.

(2) Until the software update described in paragraph (1) is complete, the consumer credit reporting agency shall, in keeping with industry best practices, employ reasonable compensating controls to reduce the risk of a breach caused by computer system vulnerability as described in subdivision (a).

(b) Notwithstanding whether a software update is available, the consumer credit reporting agency, in keeping with industry best practices, shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify, prioritize, and address the highest risk security vulnerabilities most quickly in order to reduce the likelihood that the vulnerabilities that pose
 the greatest security risk will be exploited.

(2) Test and evaluate the impact of compensating controls and software updates and how they affect the vulnerability of the system to threats to the security of computerized data.

(3) Require, by contract, that the third party implement and maintain appropriate security measures for personal information. Contracting with a third party to maintain personal information about California residents shall not relieve the consumer credit agency of the requirements of this section.

(c) As used in this section, “significant risk” means a vulnerability score, calculated using a standard measurement system that is accepted as a best practice for the industry, to determine that the risk could reasonably result in a breach of the security of the system, as defined in subdivision (g)
 of Section 1798.82, of personal information, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1798.82.

(d) As used in this section, “compensating controls” means controls that the agency reasonably believes will prevent the computer system vulnerability as described in subdivision (a) from being exploited while the software update is being tested, assessed, and a plan for implementation is being developed, and have been adequately tested and confirmed to sufficiently offset the risk of breach caused by computer system vulnerability as described in subdivision (a).

(e) Nothing in this section shall reduce the responsibilities and obligations of a consumer credit reporting agency or third party under this title, including, but not limited to, Section 1798.81.5.

(f) The Attorney General has exclusive authority to enforce this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.82.

(a) (1) An individual or business that conducts business in California, and that owns or licenses computerized data that includes personal information, shall disclose a breach of the security of the system following discovery or notification of the breach in the security of the data to a resident of California whose unencrypted personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person, or whose encrypted personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person and the encryption key or security credential was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person, and the person or business that owns or licenses the
 encrypted information has a reasonable belief that the encryption key or security credential could render that personal information readable or usable.

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the disclosure required by this subdivision shall be made within 30 calendar days of discovery or notification of the data breach.

(B) An individual or business may delay the disclosure required by this subdivision to accommodate the legitimate needs of law enforcement, pursuant to subdivision (c), or as necessary to determine the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the data system.

(b) An individual or business that maintains computerized data that includes personal information that
 the individual or business does not own shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of the breach of the security of the data immediately following discovery, if the personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person.

(c) The notification required by this section may be delayed if a law enforcement agency determines that the notification will impede a criminal investigation. The notification required by this section shall be made promptly after the law enforcement agency determines that it will not compromise the investigation.

(d) An individual or business that is required to issue a security breach notification pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The security breach notification shall be written in plain language, shall be titled “Notice of Data Breach,” and shall present the information described in paragraph (2) under the following headings: “What Happened?” “What Information Was Involved?” “What We Are Doing,” “What You Can Do,” and “For More Information.” Additional information
 may be provided as a supplement to the notice.

(A) The format of the notice shall be designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information it contains.

(B) The title and headings in the notice shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed.

(C) The text of the notice and any other notice provided pursuant to this section shall be no smaller than 10-point type.

(D) For a written notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (j), use of the model security breach notification form prescribed below or use of the headings described in this paragraph with the information described in paragraph (2), written in plain language, shall be deemed
 to be in compliance with this subdivision.[NAME OF INSTITUTION / LOGO] Date: [insert date]NOTICE OF DATA BREACH

What Happened?

 

What Information Was Involved?

What We Are Doing.

What You Can Do.

 Other Important Information.[insert other important information]

For More Information.

Call [telephone number] or go to [internet
 website]
(E) For an electronic notice described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j), use of the headings described in this paragraph with the information described in paragraph (2), written in plain language, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subdivision.

(2) The security breach notification described in paragraph (1) shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) The name and contact information of the reporting individual or business subject to this section.

(B) A list of the types of personal information that were or are reasonably believed to have
 been the subject of a breach.

(C) If the information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided, then any of the following: (i) the date of the breach, (ii) the estimated date of the breach, or (iii) the date range within which the breach occurred. The notification shall also include the date of the notice.

(D) Whether notification was delayed as a result of a law enforcement investigation, if that information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided.

(E) A general description of the breach incident, if that information is possible to determine at the time the notice is provided.

(F) The toll-free telephone numbers and
 addresses of the major credit reporting agencies if the breach exposed a social security number or a driver’s license or California identification card number.

(G) If the individual or business providing the notification was the source of the breach, an offer to provide appropriate identity theft prevention and mitigation services, if any, shall be provided at no cost to the affected individual for not less than 12 months along with all information necessary to take advantage of the offer to any individual whose information was or may have been breached if the breach exposed or may have exposed personal information defined in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h).

(3) At the discretion of the individual or business, the security breach
 notification may also include any of the following:

(A) Information about what the individual or business has done to protect individuals whose information has been breached.

(B) Advice on steps that people whose information has been breached may take to protect themselves.

(C) In breaches involving biometric data, instructions on how to notify other entities that used the same type of biometric data as an authenticator to no longer rely on data for authentication purposes.

(e) A covered entity under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d et seq.) will be deemed to have complied with the notice requirements
 in subdivision (d) if it has complied completely with Section 13402(f) of the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5). However, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to exempt a covered entity from any other provision of this section.

(f) An individual or business that is required to issue a security breach notification pursuant to this section to more than 500 California residents as a result of a single breach of the security system shall electronically submit a single sample copy of that security breach notification, excluding any personally identifiable information, to the Attorney General within 15 calendar days of notifying affected consumers of the security breach. A single sample copy of a security breach notification shall not be deemed to be within Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, “breach of the security of the system” means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal information maintained by the individual or business. Good faith acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of the individual or business for the purposes of the individual or business is not a breach of the security of the system, provided that the personal
 information is not used or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.

(h) For purposes of this section, “personal information” means either of the following:

(1) An individual’s first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the name or the data elements are not encrypted:

(A) Social security number.

(B) Driver’s license number, California identification card number, tax identification number, passport number, military identification number, or other unique identification number issued on a government document commonly used to verify the identity of a specific individual.

(C) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination with any required security code, access code, or password that would permit access to an individual’s financial account.

(D) Medical information.

(E) Health insurance information.

(F) Unique biometric data generated from measurements or technical analysis of human body characteristics, such as a fingerprint, retina, or iris image, used to authenticate a specific individual. Unique biometric data does not include a physical or digital photograph, unless used or stored for facial recognition purposes.

(G) Information or data collected
 through the use or operation of an automated license plate recognition system, as defined in Section 1798.90.5.

(H) Genetic data.

(2) A username or email address, in combination with a password or security question and answer that would permit access to an online account.

(i) (1) For purposes of this section, “personal information” does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.

(2) For purposes of this section, “medical information” means any information regarding an individual’s medical history, mental or physical condition,
 or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional.

(3) For purposes of this section, “health insurance information” means an individual’s health insurance policy number or subscriber identification number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to identify the individual, or any information in an individual’s application and claims history, including any appeals records.

(4) For purposes of this section, “encrypted” means rendered unusable, unreadable, or indecipherable to an unauthorized person through a security technology or methodology generally accepted in the field of information security.

(5) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis of a biological
 sample of an individual, or from another source enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns genetic material. Genetic material includes, but is not limited to, deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, alterations or modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), uninterpreted data that results from analysis of the biological sample or other source, and any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.

(j) For purposes of this section, “notice” may be provided by one of the following methods:

(1) Written notice.

(2) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic
 records and signatures set forth in Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(3) Substitute notice, if the individual or business demonstrates that the cost of providing notice would exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or that the affected class of subject persons to be notified exceeds 500,000, or the individual or business does not have sufficient contact information. Substitute notice shall consist of all of the following:

(A) Email notice when the individual or business has an email address for the subject persons.

(B) Conspicuous posting, for a minimum of 30 days, of the notice on the internet website page of the individual or business, if the individual or business maintains one. For
 purposes of this subparagraph, conspicuous posting on the individual’s or business’s internet website means providing a link to the notice on the home page or first significant page after entering the internet website that is in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the link.

(C) Notification to major statewide media.

(4) In the case of a breach of the security of the system involving personal information defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) for an online account, and no other personal information defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), the individual or business may comply with this
 section by providing the security breach notification in electronic or other form that directs the individual whose personal information has been breached promptly to change the individual’s password and security question or answer, as applicable, or to take other steps appropriate to protect the online account with the individual or business and all other online accounts for which the individual whose personal information has been breached uses the same username or email address and password or security question or answer.

(5) In the case of a breach of the security of the system involving personal information defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) for login credentials of an email account furnished by the individual or business, the individual or business shall not comply with this section by providing the security breach notification to
 that email address, but may, instead, comply with this section by providing notice by another method described in this subdivision or by clear and conspicuous notice delivered to the resident online when the resident is connected to the online account from an Internet Protocol address or online location from which the individual or business knows the resident customarily accesses the account.

(k) For purposes of this section, “encryption key” and “security credential” mean the confidential key or process designed to render data usable, readable, and decipherable.

(l) Notwithstanding subdivision (j), an
 individual or business that maintains its own notification procedures as part of an information security policy for the treatment of personal information and is otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of this part shall be deemed to be in compliance with the notification requirements of this section if the individual or business notifies subject individuals in accordance with its policies in the event of a breach of security of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 319, Sec. 1.   (SB 446)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.83.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), if a business has an established business relationship with a customer and has within the immediately preceding calendar year disclosed personal information that corresponds to any of the categories of personal information set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) to third parties, and if the business knows or reasonably should know that the third parties used the personal information for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes, that business shall, after the receipt of a
 written or electronic mail request, or, if the business chooses to receive requests by toll-free telephone or facsimile numbers, a telephone or facsimile request from the customer, provide all of the following information to the customer free of charge:

(1) In writing or by electronic mail, a list of the categories set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) that correspond to the personal information disclosed by the business to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes during the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2) In writing or by electronic mail, the names and addresses of all of the third parties that received personal information from the business for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes during the preceding calendar year and, if the nature of the third parties’ business cannot reasonably be determined from the third parties’ name,
 examples of the products or services marketed, if known to the business, sufficient to give the customer a reasonable indication of the nature of the third parties’ business.

(b) (1) A business required to comply with this section shall designate a mailing address, electronic mail address, or, if the business chooses to receive requests by telephone or facsimile, a toll-free telephone or facsimile number, to which customers may deliver requests pursuant to subdivision (a). A business required to comply with this section shall, at its election, do at least one of the following:

(A) Notify all agents and managers who directly supervise employees who regularly have contact with customers of the designated addresses or numbers or the means to obtain those addresses or numbers and instruct those employees that customers who inquire about the business’s privacy
 practices or the business’s compliance with this section shall be informed of the designated addresses or numbers or the means to obtain the addresses or numbers.

(B) Add to the home page of its Web site a link either to a page titled “Your Privacy Rights” or add the words “Your Privacy Rights” to the home page’s link to the business’s privacy policy. If the business elects to add the words “Your Privacy Rights” to the link to the business’s privacy policy, the words “Your Privacy Rights” shall be in the same style and size as the link to the business’s privacy policy. If the business does not display a link to its privacy policy on the home page of its Web site, or does not have a privacy policy, the words “Your Privacy Rights” shall be written in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks